District of Columbia statutes.
2-102

“Person” defined.

Wherever the word “person” is used in this subchapter it shall include individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, and corporations.

History

June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1917, ch. 802, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1002.
1973 Ed., § 1-702.